incubator/apertium-zh_CN-zh_TW/apertium-zh_CN-zh_TW.zh_CN.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
        <alphabet>讨厌</alphabet>
	<sdefs>
	   <sdef n="n"/>
	   <sdef n="vblex"/>
	   <sdef n="adj"/>
	   <sdef n="part"/>
	   <sdef n="count"/>
	   <sdef n="sg"/>
	   <sdef n="pl"/>
	   <sdef n="prn"/>
	</sdefs>
	
	<pardefs>
		<pardef n="我__prn">
		   <e>
			 <p>
			   <l/>
			   <r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		   </e>
		   <e>
			 <p>
			   <l>们</l>
			   <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		   </e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="爱人__n">
		   <e>
			 <p>
			   <l/>
			   <r><s n="n"/></r>
			 </p>
		   </e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="爱__vblex">
			<e>
			   <p>
				 <l/>
				 <r><s n="vblex"/></r>
			   </p>
			</e>
		</pardef>
	</pardefs>

		<e lm="我"><i>我</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
		<e lm="你"><i>你</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
		<e lm="您"><i>您</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
		<e lm="他"><i>他</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
		<e lm="她"><i>她</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
		<e lm="它"><i>它</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
		<e lm="咱"><i>咱</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
		<e lm="办法"><i>办法</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="北边"><i>北边</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="边"><i>边</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="菜"><i>菜</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="车"><i>车</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="成绩"><i>成绩</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="床"><i>床</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="词"><i>词</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="打算"><i>打算</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="道理"><i>道理</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="点心"><i>点心</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="电灯"><i>电灯</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="东"><i>东</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="冬"><i>冬</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="发展"><i>发展</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="饭"><i>饭</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="方向"><i>方向</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="风"><i>风</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="附近"><i>附近</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="歌"><i>歌</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="工业"><i>工业</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="姑娘"><i>姑娘</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="国"><i>国</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="海"><i>海</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="好处"><i>好处</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="后边"><i>后边</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="化学"><i>化学</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="活儿"><i>活儿</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="机场"><i>机场</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="鸡蛋"><i>鸡蛋</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="建设"><i>建设</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="饺子"><i>饺子</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="节目"><i>节目</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="经过"><i>经过</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="橘子"><i>橘子</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="咖啡"><i>咖啡</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="课"><i>课</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="口语"><i>口语</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="里边"><i>里边</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="联系"><i>联系</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="留学生"><i>留学生</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="录音"><i>录音</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="帽子"><i>帽子</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="面包"><i>面包</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="名字"><i>名字</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="南边儿"><i>南边儿</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="年级"><i>年级</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="农村"><i>农村</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="排球"><i>排球</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="朋友"><i>朋友</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="票"><i>票</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="铅笔"><i>铅笔</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="前边儿"><i>前边儿</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="情况"><i>情况</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="人"><i>人</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="日语"><i>日语</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="山"><i>山</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="上午"><i>上午</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="声音"><i>声音</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="胜利"><i>胜利</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="食堂"><i>食堂</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="市"><i>市</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="书"><i>书</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="水果"><i>水果</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="宿舍"><i>宿舍</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="糖"><i>糖</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="条件"><i>条件</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="同志"><i>同志</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="外边"><i>外边</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="外语"><i>外语</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="晚上"><i>晚上</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="文学家"><i>文学家</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="西边"><i>西边</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="夏天"><i>夏天</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="小时"><i>小时</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="星期一"><i>星期一</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="星期天"><i>星期天</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="宴会"><i>宴会</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="椅子"><i>椅子</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="英文"><i>英文</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="语法"><i>语法</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="早上"><i>早上</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="纸"><i>纸</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="周一"><i>周一</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="猪"><i>猪</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="嘴"><i>嘴</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="带"><i>带</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="关系"><i>关系</i><par n="爱人__n"/></e>
		<e lm="摆"><i>摆</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="办"><i>办</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="抱"><i>抱</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="比"><i>比</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="变"><i>变</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="表示"><i>表示</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="表演"><i>表演</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="擦"><i>擦</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="参加"><i>参加</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="差"><i>差</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="朝"><i>朝</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="吃"><i>吃</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="抽"><i>抽</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="出发"><i>出发</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="穿"><i>穿</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="打"><i>打</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="戴"><i>戴</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="代表"><i>代表</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="倒"><i>倒</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="得"><i>得</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="低"><i>低</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="丢"><i>丢</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="动"><i>动</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="锻炼"><i>锻炼</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="饿"><i>饿</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="发生"><i>发生</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="发展"><i>发展</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="翻译"><i>翻译</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="方便"><i>方便</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="放"><i>放</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="分"><i>分</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="服务"><i>服务</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="复习"><i>复习</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="改"><i>改</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="感到"><i>感到</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="感谢"><i>感谢</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="搞"><i>搞</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="跟"><i>跟</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="刮"><i>刮</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="关"><i>关</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="关心"><i>关心</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="过"><i>过</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="喝"><i>喝</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="还"><i>还</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="会"><i>会</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="寄"><i>寄</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="加"><i>加</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="建设"><i>建设</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="教育"><i>教育</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="解决"><i>解决</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="进来"><i>进来</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="经验"><i>经验</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="开"><i>开</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="咳嗽"><i>咳嗽</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="来"><i>来</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="例如"><i>例如</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="了"><i>了</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="留念"><i>留念</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="买"><i>买</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="念"><i>念</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="派"><i>派</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="骑"><i>骑</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="去"><i>去</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="认为"><i>认为</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="生活"><i>生活</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="使用"><i>使用</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="收拾"><i>收拾</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="说"><i>说</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="算"><i>算</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="讨论"><i>讨论</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="提高"><i>提高</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="停"><i>停</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="推"><i>推</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="完成"><i>完成</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="为"><i>为</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="喜欢"><i>喜欢</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="像"><i>像</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="谢谢"><i>谢谢</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="休息"><i>休息</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="研究"><i>研究</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="以为"><i>以为</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="有"><i>有</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="愿意"><i>愿意</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="展览"><i>展览</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="长"><i>长</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="知道"><i>知道</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="祝"><i>祝</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="组织"><i>组织</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
